Utah statutes.
58-3a-303.    Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.
(1)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in accordance
with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  The division may by rule
extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as one year to stagger the
renewal cycles it administers.
(2)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the
license unless the licensee renews it in accordance with Section 58-1-308.
